New York, session 2025-2026, S1952.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 1270-a of the public authorities 2 law is amended by adding a new paragraph (f) to read as follows: 3 (f) (1) Notwithstanding any inconsistent provision of law, but subject 4 to agreements with noteholders and bondholders, the authority shall 5 provide residents of the county of Rockland who are charged the central 6 business district toll pursuant to section seventeen hundred four-a of 7 the vehicle and traffic law with a rebate from the Rockland county 8 central business district toll account established pursuant to section 9 twelve hundred seventy-bb of this title. 10 (2) The Triborough bridge and tunnel authority shall promulgate any 11 rules and regulations necessary for the implementation of subparagraph 12 one of this paragraph. 13 § 2. The public authorities law is amended by adding a new section 14 1270-bb to read as follows: 15 § 1270-bb. Rockland county central business district toll account. 1. 16 The authority shall create and establish a fund to be known as the 17 "Rockland county central business district toll account" which shall be 18 kept separate from and shall not be commingled with any other moneys of 19 the authority. 20 2. The metropolitan transportation authority Rockland county central 21 business district toll account shall consist of moneys transferred by 22 the authority pursuant to paragraph (f) of subdivision four of section 23 twelve hundred seventy-a of this title. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD03505-01-5 S. 1952 2 1 3. The authority shall provide a rebate to Rockland county residents 2 who are charged the central business district toll pursuant to section 3 seventeen hundred four-a of the vehicle and traffic law. Such rebate 4 shall be equivalent to the price of such toll. 5 § 3. This act shall take effect on the sixtieth day after it shall 6 have become a law.